Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB161.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 186.400 TO 186.640 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Identity document" means an operator's license or personal identification
card issued under KRS 186.4102, 186.412, 186.4121, 186.4122, or
186.4123; and
(b) "Third-party entity" means a person or entity that has received approval
from the cabinet to process identity documents and includes but is not
limited to businesses and nonprofit member associations.
(2) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish procedures by which third-party
entities may apply to the cabinet to serve as application processors for identity
documents.
(3) A third-party entity that wishes to serve as an application processor for identity
documents under this section shall:
(a) Apply to the cabinet and receive cabinet approval;
(b) Agree to comply with all relevant administrative regulations and policies of
the cabinet; and
(c) Collect all fees required under KRS 186.531 and transmit them to the
cabinet in a timely fashion.
(4) In addition to the fees set forth in KRS 186.531, a third-party entity that processes
applications for identity documents under this section may charge a fee for the
service provided.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/10/2024 2:50 PM Jacketed